Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-4519
Rules and regulations.

The director may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to carry out the Long-Term Care Insurance Act, including minimum standards for insurance producer training.

Laws 1992, LB 1006, § 53;

Laws 2007, LB117, § 11.